en: Baby/Toddler furniture items included: Bassinet; Bookshelf; Changing table; Crib; Dresser; High chair; Nightstand; Rocking chair; Toddler bed; Toy chest; Wardrobe; Other
ro-RO: Mobilier pentru bebeluși/copii mici inclus: Leagăn; Raft pentru cărți; Masă de înfășat; Pătuț; Comodă; Scaun înalt; Noptieră; Balansoar; Pat pentru copii mici; Cufăr pentru jucării; Dulap; Altele
pt-BR: Móveis para bebês/crianças incluídos: Moisés; Estante; Trocador; Berço; Cômoda; Cadeirões; Mesa de cabeceira; Cadeira de balanço; Cama infantil; Baú de brinquedos; Guarda-roupa; Outro
de: Baby-/Kleinkindmöbel inklusive: Stubenwagen; Bücherregal; Wickeltisch; Schenkel; Kommode; Hochstuhl; Nachttisch; Schaukelstuhl; Kinderbett; Spielzeugkiste; Kleiderschrank; Sonstiges
fi: Vauvan/taaperon huonekalut sisältyvät: Vauvankori; Kirjahylly; Hoitopöydät; Vauvansänky; Lipasto; Syöttötuoli; Yöpöytä; Keinutuolit; Lastensänky; Leluarkut; Vaatekaappi; Muu
hr-HR: Uključeni komadi namještaja za bebe / malu djecu: Kolijevka; Polica za knjige; Stol za presvlačenje; Dječji krevetić; Komoda; Hranilica; Noćni ormarić; Stolica za ljuljanje; Dječji krevet; Škrinja za igračke; Ormar; Ostalo
ru: Состав набора мебели для детей или младенцев: Люлька; Книжная полка; Пеленальный столик; Детская кроватка; Комод; Высокий стульчик; Тумбочка; Кресло-качалка; Кровать для тоддлеров; Ящик для игрушек; Гардероб; Другое
sl-SI: Priloženi elementi pohištva za dojenčke in malčke: Košara; Knjižna polica; Previjalna miza; Zibelka; Komoda; Stol za hranjenje; Nočna omarica; Gugalni stol; Otroška postelja; Skrinja za igrače; Garderobna omara; Drugo
es: Características de los artículos de muebles para niños pequeños/bebés: Capazo; Estante para libros; Cambiador; Cuna; Vestidor; Silla alta; Mesita de noche; Mecedora; Cama para niños pequeños; Baúl para juguetes; Armario; Otros
sk-SK: Kusy dojčenského nábytku v cene: Kolíska; Knižnica; Prebaľovací pult; Postieľka; Komoda; Detská jedálenská stolička; Nočný stolík; Hojdacie kreslo; Postieľka pre batoľatá; Truhlica na hračky; Šatníková skriňa; Iné
sv: Baby-/småbarnsmöbler som ingår: Bassinet; Bokhylla; Skötbord; Spjälsäng; Byrå; Hög stol; Nattduksbord; Gungstolar; Småbarnssäng; Leksakslåda; Garderob; Övrigt
nl: Baby-/peutermeubels inbegrepen: Bassinet; Boekenplank; Commode; Wieg; Dressoir; Hoge stoel; Nachtkastje; Schommelstoel; Peuterbed; Speelgoedkist; Kledingkast; Andere
zh-CN: 包含婴幼儿家具用品: 摇篮; 书架; 换尿布台; 婴儿床; 梳妆台; 高脚椅; 床头柜; 摇椅; 儿童床; 玩具柜; 衣柜; 其他
it: Articoli di arredamento per neonati/bambini inclusi: Bassinet; Bookshelf; Fasciatoio; Culla; Dresser; Seggiolone; Comodino; Sedia a dondolo; Lettino; Cesta dei giocattoli; Armadio; Altro
nb: Møbelvarer for baby og småbarn: Bassinet; Bokhylle; Stellebord; Krybbe; Dresser; Barnestol; Nattbord; Gyngestol; Småbarnseng; Lekekiste; Garderobe; Annet
vi: Bao gồm đồ đạc dành cho trẻ sơ sinh/trẻ tập đi: Nôi; Giá sách; Bàn thay tã bỉm; Giường cũi; Tủ quần áo; Ghế cao; Nightstand; Ghế bập bênh; Giường cho trẻ tập đi; Rương đồ chơi; Tủ quần áo; Khác
hu: A tartalmazott csecsemőknek/kisgyermekeknek készült bútordarabok: Bölcső; Könyvespolc; Pelenkázóasztal; Gyerekágy; Komód; Etetőszék; Éjjeliszekrény; Hintaszék; Kisgyermekágy; Játékláda; Ruhásszekrény; Egyéb
th: รวมเฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารก/เด็กเล็ก: เปลเด็ก; ชั้นวางหนังสือ; โต๊ะเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม; เตียงเด็ก; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้ง; เก้าอี้ขายาว; โต๊ะข้างเตียง; เก้าอี้โยก; ที่นอนเด็กเล็ก; หีบใส่ของเล่น; ตู้เสื้อผ้า; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 包括嬰幼兒家具品項: 搖籃; 書架; 換尿布台; 幼兒床; 梳妝台; 高腳椅; 床頭櫃; 搖椅; 嬰兒床; 玩具箱; 衣櫃; 其他
bg-BG: Включени елементи за мебели за бебета/малки деца: Кошарка; Рафт за книги; Маса за повиване; Детско креватче; Скрин; Висок стол; Нощно шкафче; Люлеещ се стол; Легло за малки деца; Кутия за играчки; Гардероб; Други
ja: ベビー/幼児用家具付き: バシネット; ブックシェルフ; おむつ交換台; ベビーベッド; ドレッサー; ハイチェア; ナイトスタンド; ロッキングチェア; 幼児用ベッド; おもちゃ箱; ワードローブ; その他
pt-PT: Móveis para bebés/crianças incluídos: Bassinet; Estante; Mesa muda-fraldas; Berço; Cómoda; Cadeira alta; Mesa de cabeceira; Cadeira de baloiço; Camas para criança pequena; Arca para brinquedos; Guarda-roupa; Outro
da: Møbelartikler til baby og småbørn medfølger: Bassinet; Bogreol; Puslebord; Krybbe; Kommode; Høj stol; Natbord; Gyngestol; Børneseng; Legetøjskiste; Garderobe; Andet
el: Περιλαμβάνονται βρεφικά/παιδικά έπιπλα: Κούνια; Ράφι; Αλλαξιέρα; Λίκνο; Συρταριέρα; Παιδικό καρεκλάκι; Κομοδίνο; Κουνιστή καρέκλα; Παιδικό κρεβάτι; Κουτί για παιχνίδια; Ντουλάπα; Άλλο
ko: 영유아 가구 품목 포함: 요람; 책장; 기저귀 교환대; 아기 침대; 옷장; 유아용 식탁 의자; 나잇스탠드; 흔들의자; 유아용 침대; 완구함; 옷장; 기타
pl: Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt w zestawie: Koszyk dla noworodka; Półka; Przewijak; Łóżeczko; Komoda; Wysokie krzesełko; Szafka nocna; Fotel bujany; Łóżko dla dziecka; Skrzynia na zabawki; Szafa; Inne
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyalar dahil: Beşik; Kitaplık; Alt değiştirme masası; Beşik; Şifonyer; Mama sandalyesi; Komidin; Sallanan sandalye; Küçük çocuk yatağı; Oyuncak sandığı; Giysi dolabı; Diğer
lt-LT: Baldų kūdikiams / mažiems vaikams komplekte esantys elementai: Lopšys; Knygų lentyna; Vystymo stalas; Vaikiška lovelė; Komoda; Maitinimo kėdutė; Naktinis staliukas; Supama kėdė; Lovytė mažiems vaikams; Žaislų dėžė; Drabužių spinta; Kita
fr: Articles mobiliers pour bébé/enfant en bas âge inclus: Berceau; Étagère à livres; Table à langer; Berceau; Commode; Chaise haute; Table de nuit; Fauteuil à bascule; Lit pour enfant en bas âge; Coffre à jouets; Garde-robe; Autre
cs: Obsažené součásti nábytku pro miminka a batolata: Kočárek; Policový; Přebalovací stůl; Postýlka; Prádelník; Dětská vysoká židlička; Noční stolek; Houpací křeslo; Postýlka pro batolata; Truhla na hračky; Šatník; Jiné